Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-628
District; additional powers.

In addition to the rights and powers enumerated in Chapter 70, article 6, and in no manner limiting or restricting the same, each district shall be deemed to be and shall have and exercise each and all of the rights and powers of a public electric light and power district or public power district within the meaning of sections 70-501 to 70-503.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 6, p. 346;

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 5, p. 583;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-706;

Laws 1943, c. 146, § 3(4), p. 523;

R.S.1943, § 70-628;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 19.

This section relates to means by which a district may exercise the powers recited in the petition for creation of the district. Schroll v. City of Beatrice, 169 Neb. 162, 98 N.W.2d 790 (1959).